District of Columbia statutes.
26-318

Books, accounts, and other records of licensee.

Each licensee under this chapter shall keep and use such books, accounts, and other records as the Superintendent [Commissioner] shall require to carry into effect the provisions of this chapter and any rules and regulations issued by the Superintendent [Commissioner] under this chapter. Every licensee shall preserve such books, accounts, and records for at least 3 years.

History

May 12, 1998, D.C. Law 12-111, § 19, 45 DCR 1782

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 26-1118.